Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201944-5501
Act, how cited.

Sections 44-5501 to 44-5515 shall be known and may be cited as the Surplus Lines Insurance Act.

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB117, § 21;

Laws 2019, LB469, § 1.
September 1, 2019